California, session 20252026, AB355.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 519 of the Penal Code is amended to read:519. Fear, such as will constitute extortion, Fear that constitutes extortion may be induced by a threat of any of the following:1.(a) To do an unlawful injury to the person or property of the individual threatened or of a third person.2.(b) To accuse the individual threatened, or a relative of his the individual, or her, or a member of his or her their family, of a crime.3.(c) To expose, or to impute to him, her, the individual threatened, a relative of the individual, or them a member of their family, a deformity, disgrace, or crime.4.(d) To expose a secret affecting him, her, the individual threatened, a relative of the individual, or them. a member of their family.5.(e) To report his, her, the individual threatened, a relative of the individual, or a member of the individual’s family, of their immigration status or suspected immigration status.(f) To post, distribute, or create AI-generated images or videos of another.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.